Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1224
Administrator; microfilm; micrographic equipment; powers.

The administrator shall:

(1) Be empowered to review the microfilm systems within every state agency;

(2) Be empowered to cause such systems to be merged with a central microfilm
agency in the event that a cost analysis shows that economic advantage may
be achieved;

(3) Be empowered to permit the establishment of microfilming services
within any state agency if
a potential economy or a substantial convenience for the state would result;
and

(4) Be empowered
to determine the operating locations of all micrographic equipment in his or her possession.

Laws 1977, LB 520, § 4;

Laws 2012, LB719, § 28.